Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.210

Compensation—Attorney's fees.

If testator by will makes provision for the compensation of his or her personal representative, that shall be taken as his or her full compensation unless he or she files in the court a written instrument renouncing all claim for the compensation provided by the will before qualifying as personal representative. The personal representative, when no compensation is provided in the will, or when he or she renounces all claim to the compensation provided in the will, shall be allowed such compensation for his or her services as the court shall deem just and reasonable. Additional compensation may be allowed for his or her services as attorney and for other services not required of a personal representative. An attorney performing services for the estate at the instance of the personal representative shall have such compensation therefor out of the estate as the court shall deem just and reasonable. Such compensation may be allowed at the final account; but at any time during administration a personal representative or his or her attorney may apply to the court for an allowance upon the compensation of the personal representative and upon attorney's fees. If the court finds that the personal representative has failed to discharge his or her duties as such in any respect, it may deny him or her any compensation whatsoever or may reduce the compensation which would otherwise be allowed.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2043; 1965 c 145 s 11.48.210. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 158; RRS s 1528; prior: Code 1881 s 1541; 1854 p 295 s 164.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SPR 98.12W.

Allowance of necessary expenses: RCW 11.48.050.

Will contests, costs: RCW 11.24.050.